Hawaii statutes.
§432E-7 Information to enrollees. (a)
The managed care plan shall provide to its enrollees upon enrollment and
thereafter upon request the following information:

(1) A list of participating providers which shall be
updated on a regular basis indicating, at a minimum, their specialty and
whether the provider is accepting new patients;

(2) A complete description of benefits, services, and
copayments;

(3) A statement on enrollee's rights,
responsibilities, and obligations;

(4) An explanation of the referral process, if any;

(5) Where services or benefits may be obtained;

(6) Information on complaints and appeals procedures;
and

(7) The telephone number of the insurance division.

This information shall be provided to prospective
enrollees upon request.

(b) Every managed care plan shall provide to
the commissioner and its enrollees notice of any material change in
participating provider agreements, services, or benefits, if the change affects
the organization or operation of the managed care plan and the enrollee's
services or benefits. The managed care plan shall provide notice to enrollees
not more than sixty days after the change in a format that makes the notice
clear and conspicuous so that it is readily noticeable by the enrollee.

(c) A managed care plan shall provide generic
participating provider contracts to enrollees, upon request. [L 1998, c 178, pt
of §2; am L 1999, c 137, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next